apertium-chv.chv.twol
"Delete {ӑ} after a vowel"
%{ӑ%}:0 <=> :Glasnye/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
            except
!!  [ ӳ: | у: ]/[ %>: | :0 | :в ]* _ ;
! This doesn't seem right ...  what was it supposed to do?
   [ ӳ: | у: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] :в [ %>: | :0 ]* _ ;
                                    :Cns/:0* _ ;
                %{У%}: %{н2%}:/:0 _ н: .#. ;
                         %{dup%}: _ %>: [ %{Ӑ%}: | %{ӑ%}: | %{н%}: | %{У%}: ] ;
             %{М%}: [ %>: | :0 ]* _ н: .#. ;	! to avoid conflict with "Delete ӗ/ӑ part of -Ӑн after plural М and px3 и and px2sg {У}"
                       %{Ӗ%}:и/:0 _ н: .#. ;	! to avoid conflict with "Delete ӗ/ӑ part of -Ӑн after plural М and px3 и and px2sg {У}"
                %{У%}: %{н2%}:/:0 _ н: .#. ;	! to avoid conflict with "Delete ӗ/ӑ part of -Ӑн after plural М and px3 и and px2sg {У}"
! ӳхӗ>{ӑ}н:ӳхӗн
! ача>{ӑ}н:ачан 
! пӗлӗв>{ӑ}н:пӗлӗвӗн
! тӑв>{ӑ}н:тӑвӑн
! хӑйӑв>{ӑ}н:хӑйӑвӑн
!!!!! JNW TMP
!"Delete vowels before {Ӑ}"
!Vx:0 <=> _ %{Ӑ%}:/[ %>: | [ :0 - ӗ:0 ] ] ;
!                  ! лаша<px2pl> = лаш·ӑр
!                  ! кӗнекe<px2pl> = кӗнек·ӗр
!                  ! дело<px2pl> = дел·ӑр
!                  ! сӑвӑ<px2pl> = сӑвв·ӑр
!						! училище<n><px2pl><nom> = училищ{Ӗ}>{dup}{Ӑdel}р = училищӗр
!						! кала<v><tv><fut><p1><sg> = калӑп
!	except			! Conflicts with other rules which also delete the vowel
!               _ %>: %{dup%}:* %{У%}: ;
!               _ %{del%}: %>: ;
!               _ %{w%}: [ %>: | :0 ]* %{А%}: .#. ;
!!               _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: %{ӗ%}: ;
!!               _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{У%}: ;
!! the above contexts COMBINED below
!               _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: [ %{У%}: | [ %{в%}: ӗ: ] ] ;
!	where Vx in ( а е о ӑ ӗ %{Ӗ%} ) ;
!
!"Delete vowels before ӗ"
!Vx:0 <=> _ ӗ:/[ :0 ] ;		! кала<v><tv><fut><p3><sg> = калӗ
!	except			! Conflicts with other rules which also delete the vowel
!! FIXME: can these following two contexts be combined?
!               _ %>: %{dup%}:* %{У%}: ;
!               _ %>: %{dup%}: ;
!               _ %{del%}: %>: ;
!               _ %{w%}: [ %>: | :0 ]* %{А%}: .#. ;
!               _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: ӗ: ;
!	where Vx in ( а е о ӑ ӗ ) ;

!!!! JNWTMP
!"Delete given vowel previous to {иdel}"
!Vx:0 <=> _ %{иdel%}:/[ :0 ] ;		! кала<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> = калин
!	except			! Conflicts with other rules which also delete the vowel
!! FIXME: can these following two contexts be combined?
!               _ %>: %{dup%}: ;
!               _ %>: %{dup%}:* %{У%}: ;
!               _ %{del%}: %>: ;
!               _ %{w%}: [ %>: | :0 ]* %{А%}: .#. ;
!               _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: ӗ: ;
!	where Vx in ( а е о ӑ ӗ ) ;


!!!!! Phonology for dative alternations !!!!!

"Delete ӗ/ӑ in stem before dative е/а"
Vx:0 <=> _ %{w%}: [ %>: | :0 ]* %{А%}: .#. ;
         except
!                             _ %>: %{У%}: ;
!                             _ %>: %{dup%}: %{У%}: ;
! these two contexts COMBINED below:
                             _ %>: (%{dup%}:) %{У%}: ;
                             _ %{Ӑdel%}:/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
                         %>: _ ; 
         :Glasnye :Soglasnye _ %{w%}: ;
                 .#. п у р т _ %{w%}: ;
             %{ː%}:Soglasnye _ ;           !JNW TEMPorarily avoid conflict
         where Vx in ( ӗ ӑ ) ;
! ӳхӗ>{н}{А}:ӳхе
! ача>{н}{А}:ачана
! ам>ӑш>ӗ{w}>{н}{А}:амӑшӗ

! VERIFY: .#. seems odd as some suffixes may be added, e.g. -Ах
"н surfaces after vowels (in dative)"
%{н%}:н <=>            :Glasnye/[ %>: | :0 ] _ %{А%}: ;	! кӗнеке<n><dat> = кӗнекене
                            ӗ:0/[ %>: | :0 ] _ %{А%}: ;	! уй%>%{dup%}%{в%}%{ӗ%}%{н%}%{w%}%>%{н%}%{А%}: уйне (уй%<px3sp%>%<dat%>)
! CHECK: These following two rules should be unnecessary
!                        %{ӗ%}:и/[ %>: | :0 ] _ %{А%}: ;	! истори%>%{dup%}%{в%}%{ӗ%}%{н%}%{w%}%>%{н%}%{А%}: историне (истори%<px3sp%>%<dat%>)
                        				! литератур%{ӑ%}%>%{dup%}%{в%}%{ӗ%}%{н%}%{w%}%>%{н%}%{А%}: литературине (литератарура%<px3sp%>%<dat%>)
!                        %{Ӑ%}:и/[ %>: | :0 ] _ %{А%}: ;
! ывӑл>{У}{н}>{н}{А}:ывӑлна
                                             _ [ %{Р%}: | %{Т%}: ] /[ %>: | :0 ] ;
            except
!                                    %{У%}:0 _ [ %{н%}:н %{А%}: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] .#. ;
!          [ у: | ӳ: | %{У%}: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ %{А%}: ;
!                    [ %{У%}: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ %{А%}: ;
   [ ӳ: | у: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] :в [ %>: | :0 ]* _ ;
                    [ ӑ: | ӗ: ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - %{RUS%}:0 ] ] _ %{А%}: ;
             и %{й%}:* %{RUS%}:* %{w%}:  %>: _ %{А%}: ;		! шӑши<n><dat> = шӑшие (epenthesis: й) - only dat, not px3sp.dat
								! Золотницкий<n><dat> (и{й}) = Золотницкие
!       %{и2%}: %{й%}:* %{RUS%}:* %{w%}:  %>: _ %{А%}: ;		! Золотницкий<n><dat> ({и2}{й}) = Золотницки
!                   й:0 %{RUS%}:* %{w%}:  %>: _ %{А%}: ;		! май<n><dat> = мая, чей<n><dat> = чее
! the above two contexts COMBINED below:
       [ [ й:0 ] | [ %{и2%}: %{й%}:* ] ] %{RUS%}:* %{w%}:  %>: _ %{А%}: ;

                               ю: %{w%}: %>: _ ;
! истори{w}>{н}{А}
! ача{w}>{н}{А}:ачана
! ӳхӗ>{н}{А}:ӳхе
! ту{w}>{н}{А}:тӑва
! пул>ни{w}>{н}{А}:пулнине
! чей{w}>{н}{А}:чее
!!! ту{w}>{Ӑ}н:тӑвӑн

"н2 surfaces when followed by dat, loc, abl"  ! , gen
%{н2%}:н <=> %{У%}: _ [ %>: | :0 ]* [ %{Р%}: | %{Т%}: | %{н%}: ] ;  ! | %{Ӑ%}:

!"Delete й in чей>е"
!й:0 <=> _ %{w%}: %>: %{н%}: %{А%}: ;


!!!!! px2sg and px3sg case phonology !!!!!

!!!! "in the dative-accusative, the -u characteristic of the 2nd p. sg. drops entirely, leaving only the ending -na/-ne, except when following a vowel that's been deleted"

!"н does not surface at the end of words (in px2sg and px3sg)"
!%{н%}:0 <=> _ .#. ;
!! ывӑл>{У}{н}:ывӑлу

!"н does not surface after consonants"
!%{н%}:0 <=> S

!"{н} surfaces before {Р} (and makes it т!) in dat and abl"
!%{н%}:н <=> _ [ %{Р%}: | %{Т%}: ] /[ %>: | :0 ] ;

!"{н} surfaces after {н}:0 (in dat)"
!%{н%}:н <=> %{н%}:0/[ %>: ] _ ;

! VERIFY: .#. seems odd as some suffixes may be added, e.g. -Ах
"{У} deletes before {н}{А} when a vowel wasn't deleted in the stem (px2sg before dat)"
%{У%}:0 <=> _ %{н2%}: %{w%}:0 %>: %{н%}: %{А%}: .#. ;
            except
                       Glasnye:0/[ %{RUS%}: | %>: | %{dup%}: ] _ ;
                       %{dup%}:0/[ %>: ] _ ;
								! to avoid conflict with "й>{У} = >ю"
                       [ :BackVow й: :0* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;	! сарай>у = сараю	! FIXME: This exception causes "сара·ю·на", which is good, but not the prefered option (maybe <=> has to be changed and two rules, => and <=, have to be written)
!                           [ й: %{RUS%}: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;	! герой>у = герою	! FIXME: This exception causes "геро·ю·на", which is good, but not the prefered option (maybe <=> has to be changed and two rules, => and <=, have to be written)
!                   [ й: %{ӑ%}: %{RUS%}:  ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;	! аллей%{ӑ%}%{RUS%}>у = аллею
!               [ %{ъ%}: %{ӑ%}: %{RUS%}:  ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;	! Жен%{ъ%}%{ӑ%}%{RUS%}>у = Женю
! above three contexts COMBINED below:
     [ [ й: | %{ъ%}: ] (%{ӑ%}:) %{RUS%}: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;

! ывӑл>{У}{н}>{н}{А}:ывӑлна
! ача>{У}{н}>{н}{А}:ачуна
! ҫын{dup}>{У}{н}>{н}{А}:ҫынуна

!!!!! JNW TEMP
!"Delete vowels before {У} (1)"
!Vx:0 <=> _ %>: %{У%}: ;
!        where Vx in Glasnye ;
!
!"Delete vowels before {У} (2)"
!Vx:0 <=>       _ %>: %{dup%}: %{У%}: ;
!        except _ %>: %{dup%}:й ;	! информаци<n><px2sg><nom>: информаци>{dup}{У}{н2}: информацийӳ
!        where Vx in GlasnyeNoУӲ ;
!
!"Delete у before {У} (Russian loans)"
!у:0 <=> _ %{RUS%}: %>: %{dup%}: %{У%}: ;	! кенгуру<n><px2sg><nom> = кенгуру{RUS}>{dup}{У}{н2} = кенгур·у

!"Delete vowels before {У} (Russian loans 1)"
!Vx:0 <=> _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{У%}: ;
!        where Vx in ( %{ӑ%} %{Ӗ%} ) ;

!!!! JNW TEMP
!"Delete vowels before {У} (Russian loans 2)"
!Vx:0 <=> _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{У%}: ;
!        where Vx in ( %{ӑ%} %{Ӗ%} ) ;

!"Delete vowels before {ӗ} (Russian loans 1)"
!Vx:0 <=> _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{в%}: %{ӗ%}: ;
!        where Vx in ( %{ӑ%} %{Ӗ%} ) ;

!!!! JNW TEMP
!"Delete vowels before {ӗ} (Russian loans 2)"
!Vx:0 <=> _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: %{ӗ%}: ;
!        where Vx in ( %{ӑ%} %{Ӗ%} ) ;

!!!! JNW TEMP TEMP!!!!
!"Delete vowels before vowel-initial endings"
!Vx:0 <=> _ %{RUS%}:* [ %{У%}: | ӗ: ]/[ %>: ] ;
!     where Vx in ( %{ӑ%} %{Ӗ%} Glasnye ) ;

"Delete vowels before certain vowel-initial endings"
Vx:0 <=> _ %{RUS%}:* %>: [ [ %{А%}: | ӗ: | %{Ӑ%}: | %{У%}: | %{И%}: ] - :0 ] ;
     except
         %>: _ %{н%}: ;
     where Vx in ( Glasnye ) ;

"Delete ӗ/ӑ in stem before adjective substantivation"
Vx:0 <=> _ %>: %{и%}: ;
         where Vx in ( ӗ ӑ ) ;

!!!!! Phonology for Plural forms !!!!!

"Delete ӗ/ӑ part of -Ӑн after plural М and px3 и and px2sg {У}"
%{ӑ%}:0 <=> %{М%}: [ %>: | :0 ]* _ н: .#. ;
            %{Ӗ%}:и/:0 _ н: .#. ;
     %{У%}: %{н2%}:/:0 _ н: .#. ;
! ӳхӗ>се{М}>{ӑ}н:ӳхӗсен

"Delete н part of -Ӑн after plural М"
н:0 <=>            %{М%}: [ %>: | :0 ]* %{ӑ%}:0 _ .#. ;
! ӳхӗ>се{М}>{ӑ}н:ӳхӗсен
! ывӑлун

!"Delete {н2} before genitive after px2sg {У}"
!%{н2%}:0 <=> %{У%}: _ [ %>: | :0 ]* %{Ӑ%}:0 н: .#. ;

"Change plural М to н before dative"
%{М%}:н <=> _ [ %>: | :0 ]* %{А%}: .#. ;
! ӳхӗ>се{М}>{Ӑ}:ӳхӗсене

"Change plural М to н in genitive"
%{М%}:н <=> _ [ %>: | :0 ]* %{ӑ%}:0 н:0 .#. ;
! ӳхӗ>се{М}>{ӑ}н:ӳхӗсен
! ӳхӗ>се{М}:ӳхӗсем

"%{М%} становится н до RA"
%{М%}:н <=> _ %>: [ %{Р%}: | %{Т%}: ] ;
! ӳхӗ>се{М}>{Р}{А}н:ӳхӗсенчен


!!!!! Phonology for у/ӳ > ӑв/ӗв before vowels !!!!!

!!!! JNW TEMP
!"ӳ and у to ӗ and ӑ when a vowel follows"
!Vx:Vy <=> _ [ %{w%}:в | %{w2%}:в ] ;
!! below two contexts COMBINED above
!!          _ %{w%}:в ;                     ! %>: :0 :Glasnye ;
!!          _ %{w2%}:в ;                    ! %>: :0 :Glasnye ;
!          _ %>: %{dup%}: ;
!          where Vx in ( ӳ у )
!                Vy in ( ӗ ӑ )
!          matched ;

!"{У} to ӗ if front vowels and a vowel follows"
!%{У%}:ӗ <=> [ :FrontVow :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ %{w%}:в %>: %{н%}: %{А%}: ;
!!                [ :BackVow ь:/:Soglasnye* ] _ %{w%}: [ %>: | :0 ]* :Glasnye ;
!!                [ :BackVow ь:/:Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ :0* %{w%}: [ %>: | :0 ]* :Glasnye ;
!                [ :BackVow ь:/:Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ [ %{w%}: [ %{А%}: | %{Ӑ%}: ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ];
!! супань>{dup}{У}{н2}{w}>{н}{А} = супанӗве
!
!"в surfaces in у/ӳ > ӑв/ӗв before vowel (1)"	! genitive and dative
!!%{w%}:в <=> [ у: | ӳ: | %{У%}: ] _ [ %>: | :0 ]* :Glasnye ;
!%{w%}:в <=> [ у: | ӳ: ] _ [ %>: | :0 ]* [ %{А%}: | %{Ӑ%}: ] ;
!            %{У%}: :0* _ [ %>: | :0 ]* [ %{А%}: | %{Ӑ%}: ] ;
!
!!!!! JNW TEMP
!"в surfaces in у/ӳ > ӑв/ӗв before vowel (2)"
!%{dup%}:в <=> [ ӳ: | у: ] %>: _ ;

! THIS RULE HAS BEEN COMMENTED, AND IT SEEMS NOT TO APPLY ANYWHERE (CORPUS DIXIT). In fact, {У} should not become, in principle, ӗ
!"{У} to ӗ if front vowels and a vowel follows"
!%{У%}:ӗ <=> [ :FrontVow :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ %{w%}:в %>: %{н%}: %{А%}: ;
!          [ :BackVow ь:/:Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ [ %{w%}:в [ %{А%}: | %{Ӑ%}: ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ];
!	except [ :BackVow й: :0* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;		! сарай>у = сараю
!          [ й: %{ӑ%}: %{RUS%}:  ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;		! аллей%{ӑ%}%{RUS%}>у = аллею
!
!"в surfaces in у/ӳ > ӑв/ӗв before a vowel (1)"
!%{w%}:в <=> [ у: | ӳ: ] _ :Glasnye/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
!		! The next forms have to be explicit, otherwise both forms у/ӳ and ӑв/ӗв are generated
!		! (The upper rule says that в is generated if it is in front of a vowel, but %{Ӑ%}:ӑ only if в is generated)
!            [ у: | ӳ: ] _  %{Ӑ%}:/[ %>: | :0 ] ;			! пӳ<n><gen> = пӳ{w}>{Ӑ}н = пӗвӗн
!
!"в surfaces in у/ӳ > ӑв/ӗв before a vowel (2)"
!%{w2%}:в <=> [ у: | ӳ: ] _ :Glasnye/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
!		! The next forms have to be explicit, otherwise both forms у/ӳ and ӑв/ӗв are generated
!		! (The upper rule says that в is generated if it is in front of a vowel, but %{Ӑ%}:ӑ only if в is generated)
!             [ у: | ӳ: ] _  %{Ӑ%}:/[ %>: | :0 ] ;			! ^пу<v><tv><imp><p2><pl>$ = пу{w2}>{Ӑdel}р = пӑвӑр
